Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.260

Failure to take corporate action.

(1) If the corporation does not effect the proposed corporate action within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment and depositing share certificates, the corporation shall return the deposited certificates and release any transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares.

(2) If after returning deposited certificates and releasing transfer restrictions, the corporation wishes to effect the proposed corporate action, it must deliver a new dissenters' notice under RCW 23B.13.220 and repeat the payment demand procedure.

[ 2020 c 57 s 70; 2009 c 189 s 46; 1989 c 165 s 149.]